Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1101
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-1101 to 44-1117 shall be known and may be cited as the Viatical Settlements Act.

Laws 2001, LB 52, § 27;

Laws 2008, LB853, § 1.